Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9015

Responsible buyer status—Application—Removal—List.

(1) To become a responsible buyer, a commercial feed licensee must apply for responsible buyer status on forms provided by the department. The application must include:

(a) The name and mailing address of the licensee;

(b) The physical address of the licensee;

(c) The name, contact information, and signature of the applicant; and

(d) Other information required by the department by rule.

(2) To be removed from responsible buyer status, the licensee must notify the department in writing. The licensee is not released from responsible buyer status until the department notifies the licensee in writing of such release.

(3) The department will maintain a current list of all responsible buyers and make the list available on request.

[ 2005 c 18 s 5.]